Illinois, session 104th, HB4127.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 49-7 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/49-7 new)7    Sec. 49-7. Failure to assist a person suffering a 8life-threatening injury or great bodily harm.9    (a) A person commits failure to assist a person suffering 10a life-threatening injury or great bodily harm when he or she:11        (1) reasonably believes that another person residing 12    in the same dwelling or whom the person personally visits 13    in the dwelling is suffering a life-threatening injury or 14    great bodily harm; and15        (2) knowingly fails to notify, as soon as possible 16    after discovering the other person in that condition, a 17    law enforcement agency or other public or private entity 18    providing emergency medical technician services located 19    within the municipality or unincorporated area where the 20    person suffering the life-threatening injury or great 21    bodily harm is found.22    If there is no law enforcement agency or other public or 23private entity providing emergency medical technician services   HB4127- 2 -LRB104 14619 RLC 27761 b1located in the municipality or unincorporated area, then the 2notification shall be made to the agency or entity located 3within the same or nearest county to the discovery of the 4person suffering a life-threatening injury or great bodily 5harm.6    (b) Sentence. Failure to assist a person suffering a 7life-threatening injury or great bodily harm is a Class 4 8felony. If the violation results in death, the person is 9guilty of a Class X felony.